Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Chapter 28. The College of William and Mary in Virginia; Richard Bland College.

§ 23.1-2800.
Corporate name; name of the University.

The board of visitors of The College of William and Mary in Virginia (the board) is a corporation under the name and style of “The College of William and Mary in Virginia” and has, in addition to its other powers, (i) all the corporate powers given to corporations by the provisions of Title 13.1 except those powers that are confined to corporations created pursuant to Title 13.1 and (ii) all powers conferred by the ancient royal charter of The College of William and Mary in Virginia. The board shall at all times be under the control of the General Assembly.

The institution shall be known as The College of William and Mary in Virginia (the University).

History.

Code 1919, § 936; 1960, c. 180, § 23-39; 1962, c. 69; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2801.
Membership.

The board shall consist of 17 members appointed by the Governor, of whom at least 13 shall be residents of the Commonwealth.

The alumni association of the university may submit to the Governor a list of at least three nominees for each vacancy on the board, whether the vacancy occurs by expiration of a term or otherwise. The Governor may appoint a member from the list of nominees.

History.

Code 1919, § 935, §§ 23-41, 23-42; 1938, p. 443; 1944, pp. 401, 402; 1945, p. 51; 1960, c. 180; 1962, c. 69; 1966, c. 14; 1974, c. 29; 1975, c. 484; 1992, c. 53; 2004, c. 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2802.
Powers and duties.

The board shall generally direct the affairs of the university and Richard Bland College.

The board may confer degrees.

History.

Code 1919, §§ 935, 936, §§ 23-44, 23-46; 1938, p. 444; 1944, p. 402; 1945, p. 52; 1960, c. 180; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2803.
Investment of endowment funds, endowment income, etc.

As used in this section:“Derivative” means a contract or financial instrument or a combination of contracts and financial instruments, including any contract commonly known as a “swap,” that gives the university the right or obligation to deliver, receive delivery of, or make or receive payments based on changes in the price, value, yield, or other characteristic of a tangible or intangible asset or group of assets or changes in a rate, index of prices or rates, or other market indicator for an asset or group of assets.“Financial security” means (i) any note, stock, treasury stock, bond, debenture, evidence of indebtedness, certificate of interest, collateral-trust certificate, preorganization certificate of subscription, transferable share, investment contract, voting-trust certificate, certificate of deposit for a security, or fractional undivided interest in oil, gas, or other mineral rights; (ii) any put, call, straddle, option, or privilege on any security, certificate of deposit, or group or index of securities, including any interest therein or based on the value thereof; (iii) any put, call, straddle, option, or privilege entered into on a national securities exchange relating to foreign currency; (iv) in general, any interest or instrument commonly known as a “security”; or (v) any certificate of interest or participation in, temporary or interim security for, receipt for, guarantee of, or warrant or right to subscribe to or purchase any financial security.“Option” means an agreement or contract whereby the university may grant or receive the right to purchase, sell, or pay or receive the value of any personal property asset, including any agreement or contract that relates to any security, contract, or agreement.

The board shall invest and manage the endowment funds, endowment income, gifts, all other nongeneral fund reserves and balances, and local funds of or held by the university in accordance with this section and the provisions of the Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act (§

64.2-1100

et seq.).

No member of the board is personally liable for losses suffered by any endowment fund, endowment income, gift, other nongeneral fund reserve and balance, or local funds of or held by the university arising from investments made pursuant to the provisions of subsection B.

The investment and management of endowment funds, endowment income, gifts, all other nongeneral fund reserves and balances, or local funds of or held by the university are not subject to the provisions of the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.).

In addition to the investment practices authorized by the Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act (§

64.2-1100

et seq.), the board may invest or reinvest the endowment funds, endowment income, gifts, all other nongeneral fund reserves and balances, and local funds of or held by the university in derivatives, options, and financial securities.

The authority provided in this section to invest and reinvest nongeneral fund reserves and balances of or held by the university is predicated upon an approved management agreement between the university and the Commonwealth.

History.

2009, cc. 737, 767, § 23-44.1; 2016, c. 588.

Cross references.

As to the Virginia Administrative Process Act, generally, see Chapter 40 (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of Title 2.2.

§ 23.1-2804.
Program of instruction to educate and train teachers.

The university shall maintain a program of instruction to educate and train teachers for the public elementary and secondary schools of the Commonwealth without excluding other programs of instruction.

History.

Code 1919, § 934, § 23-47; 1960, c. 180; 1962, c. 69; 1972, c. 35; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2805.
Duties; student admissions; degrees.

The university shall admit properly prepared individuals and upon completion of the requirements shall grant them degrees.

History.

1918, p. 424; Michie Code 1942, § 938b; 1960, c. 180, § 23-49; 1962, c. 69; 1972, c. 35; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-2806.
Richard Bland College.

Richard Bland College is a separate college under the supervision, management, and control of the board. Richard Bland College shall report to the board in such manner as the board may coordinate and direct.

The board shall establish and publish bylaws for Richard Bland College that define the school’s functions.

All property, property rights, duties, contracts, and agreements of Richard Bland College are vested in the board.

The board shall designate a chief executive officer of Richard Bland College.

The board shall care for and preserve all property belonging to Richard Bland College.

The board shall (i) fix tuition, mandatory fees, and other necessary charges; (ii) appoint, remove, and define the responsibilities of the chief executive officer; and (iii) make such rules and regulations as it deems appropriate for Richard Bland College.

History.

1958, c. 15; 1960, cc. 56, 180, § 23-49.1; 1962, cc. 69, 610; 1966, cc. 14, 707; 1976, c. 21; 1992, c. 103; 2016, c. 588.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2018, cc. 832 and
845, cl. 3 provides: “That Richard Bland College shall offer a Uniform Certificate of General Studies Program and Passport Program by the 2020-2021 academic year in accordance with the guidelines developed by the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia pursuant to subdivision 20 of
§

23.1-203

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act. Baccalaureate public institutions of higher education shall be required to accept the transfer of such credits offered by Richard Bland College in the same manner as if such courses were offered at a comprehensive community college, as required by this act.”

§ 23.1-2807.
Virginia Institute of Marine Science.

The Virginia Institute of Marine Science (the Institute) is subject to the supervision, management, and control of the board. The university shall provide for the administration of the Institute and appoint and remove its administrative and professional staff.

History.

1979, c. 294, § 23-49.1:1; 2016, c. 588.

Cross references.

As to the Virginia Institute of Marine Science generally, see §

28.2-1100

et seq.

§ 23.1-2808.
Approval for transfer of College Woods.

The property known as College Woods that includes Lake Matoaka and is possessed and controlled by the university, regardless of whether such property has been declared surplus property pursuant to §

2.2-1153

, shall not be transferred or disposed of without the approval of the board by a two-thirds vote of all members at a regularly scheduled board meeting. The General Assembly shall also approve such disposal or transfer.

The provisions of subsection A shall not operate to prevent the transfer or dedication to the Virginia Department of Transportation (the Department) of a portion of the property described in subsection A, together with a temporary construction easement and a permanent easement for drainage, sufficient to permit the reconstruction of the intersection of Virginia Route 615 (Ironbound Road) and Virginia Route 321 (Monticello Avenue).

In order for any transfer or dedication set forth in subsection B to the Department to occur:

The Department shall remain within the boundaries or dedication area identified as a right-of-way addition of approximately 1.63 acres and easement areas as detailed on Exhibit A, labeled Proposed Right-of-Way and Easement Dedication by The College of William and Mary for Widening of the Intersection of Monticello Avenue and Ironbound Road and dated January 9, 2004, drawn by AES Consulting Engineers of Williamsburg, Virginia, in completion of any reconstruction of such intersection;

The Department shall employ and construct all required best management practices and erosion and sediment control measures to minimize and mitigate any impacts to College Woods and Lake Matoaka; and

The Department shall vacate, subject to a reserved drainage easement, approximately 3.22 acres of right-of-way and redesignate such to the university so that the university has confirmed encumbrances. This vacation shall create not less than a 78-foot right-of-way and shall not create or provide for any easements except for such reserved drainage easement from approximately 1,000 feet east of Virginia Route 615 (Ironbound Road) to approximately 4,000 feet east of Virginia Route 615 (Ironbound Road) along Virginia Route 321 (Monticello Avenue) identified on Exhibit A, labeled Proposed Right-of-Way and Easement Dedication by The College of William and Mary for Widening of the Intersection of Monticello Avenue and Ironbound Road and dated January 9, 2004, drawn by AES Consulting Engineers of Williamsburg, Virginia, as right-of-way abandonment. This vacation to create a right-of-way width shall not allow for a road-widening to add additional travel lanes for the remainder of Virginia Route 321 (Monticello Avenue).

The provisions of subsection A shall not operate to prevent the transfer or dedication to the Department of a portion of the property described in subsection A, together with easements for slope, drainage, and utilities, sufficient to permit the reconstruction and widening of Virginia Route 615 (Ironbound Road).

For any transfer or dedication to the Department to occur pursuant to subsection D, the Department shall:

Remain within the boundaries identified as a proposed right-of-way dedication area of approximately 0.38 acres and easement areas as detailed on Exhibit B, labeled Proposed Right-of-Way and Easement Dedication by The College of William and Mary for Widening of Ironbound Road to Four Lanes and dated January 9, 2004, drawn by AES Consulting Engineers of Williamsburg, Virginia, in completion of the widening of Virginia Route 615 (Ironbound Road), except with respect to that portion of Virginia Route 615 (Ironbound Road) to be widened in connection with the reconstruction of the intersection as described, and as provided for, in subsections B and C; and

Employ and construct all required best management practices and erosion and sediment control measures to minimize and mitigate any impacts to College Woods and Lake Matoaka.

The provisions of subsections B and C shall not become effective until a reconstruction of the intersection has been designed and fully funded as required by the Department.

The provisions of subsections D and E shall not become effective until the widening of the portion of Ironbound Road described therein has been designed and fully funded as required by the Department.

History.

1995, c. 774, § 23-4.01; 2001, c. 360; 2004, c. 339; 2016, c. 588.